apertium-gag.gag.lexc
LEXICON V-TV 
%<v%>%<tv%>:%{·%} V-DER ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!NOUN!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!



LEXICON PLURAL
!%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r V-GZ ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON ADV3
%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV4
%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} # ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG
%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-ADV 

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASES ; 


LEXICON CS
%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CA
%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON COPULA-GENERAL

%<gnl%>:%>%{й%}%{D%}%{I%}r # ;
# ; 

LEXICON COPULA-PERS-AOR


%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}m   COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{й%}s%{I%}n  COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:                COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}z    COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r   COPULA-GENERAL ;

LEXICON COPULA-PERS-PAST
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON COPULA-PERS-NFH
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m  COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}z  COPULA-GENERAL ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z COPULA-GENERAL  ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r COPULA-GENERAL ;



! TODO: PERSON AGREEMENT

LEXICON CLITIC-COPULA

%+i%<cop%>%<aor%>: COPULA-PERS-AOR ;
%+i%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>%{й%}%{D%}%{I%} COPULA-PERS-PAST ;
%+i%<cop%>%<nfh%>:%>%{й%}m%{I%}ş COPULA-PERS-NFH ;
%+i%<cop%>%<gna_cond%>:%>%{й%}s%{A%} V-PERS-S1 ;

# ; 


! TODO: OTHER TENSES

LEXICON CASES
%<nom%>: CLITIC-COPULA ;
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}n # ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}nk%{I%}%{n%} SUBST ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITIC-COPULA ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}k%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n # ;
%<abl%>:%>n%{A%}n # ;
%<acc%>:%>%{й}%{I%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{й}%{A%} # ;
%<ins%>:%>%{й}%{L%}%{A%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<ins%>:%>%{й}%{L%}%{A%}n CLITIC-COPULA ; 

LEXICON POSSESSIVES
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASES  ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n CASES ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES  ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z CASES ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z CASES  ;
                         CASES ;


!LEXICON COPULA-MIS
!%<nfh%>:%>%m%{I%}ş # ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+lı%<post%>:%>l%{I%} # ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION
PLURAL ;
POSSESSIVES ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;
!GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON SUBST-ATTR 

%<attr%>: # ; 
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-BÄN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:än # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:en # ;                        ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:enim # ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:enimk%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:eni # ;          
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ana # ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:endä # ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:endek%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:endän # ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:enimnän CLITIC-COPULA ;  

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:änim # ;                      ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:änimk%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;  ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:äni # ;                       ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ändä # ;                      ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ändek%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;  ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:enden # ;                     ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ändän # ;                     ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:änimnän  CLITIC-COPULA ;      ! Err/Orth

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SÄN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:än # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:en # ;                        ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:enin # ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:enink%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:eni # ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ana # ;                            
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:endä # ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:endek%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:endän # ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:eninnän CLITIC-COPULA ;  

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:änin # ;                      ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:änink%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;  ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:äni # ;                       ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ändä # ;                      ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ändek%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;  ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:enden # ;                     ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ändän # ;                     ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:äninnän  CLITIC-COPULA ;      ! Err/Orth

LEXICON PRON-PERS-O 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:n # ;                         ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:nun # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:nunk%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:na # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:nu # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:nda # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ndak%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ndan # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:nnan CLITIC-COPULA ;           ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:nunnan  CLITIC-COPULA ;        


LEXICON PRON-PERS-BIZ

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ler # ;                        ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:im # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:imk%{i%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ä # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:i # ;                                    
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:lerni # ;                      ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:de # ;                         ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:dä # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:däk%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:dän # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:imnän  CLITIC-COPULA ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SIZ

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:in # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ink%{i%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;        
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ä # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:i # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:de # ; ! Err/Orth
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:dä # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:däk%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:dän # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:innän  CLITIC-COPULA ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-ONNAR

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;                           
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ın # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ınk%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:a # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ı # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:da # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:dak%{I%}%{n%} SUBST-ATTR ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:dan # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:lan  CLITIC-COPULA ; 



LEXICON SUBST
                      CASES ;
                      POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r  CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r  POSSESSIVES ;

!LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC
!%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}k%{I%} SUBST ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
POSSESSIVES ;     ! for stuff like "bizim demiryolumuz" 
                  ! which should have a <px analysis

LEXICON N1 

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; 

LEXICON N2 
                      
%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON N3 

%<n%>%<pl%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON N5

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%{☭%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; 

LEXICON Nouns
insannık:insan%>%{L%}ı%{k%} N1 ; ! ""
iz:iz N1 ; ! ""
açan:açan  N1 ; ! ""
apparatura:apparatura N1 ; ! ""
bilgi:bilgi N1 ; ! 
agrometeorologiya:agrometeorologiya N1 ;
bölümlüü:bölümlüü N1 ; ! ""
dünnä:dünä N1 ; ! "" ! Err/Orth
güreşçi:güreşçi N1 ;
haliz:halis N1 ;
küüy:küüy N1 ; ! ""
liturgiya:liturgiya N1 ; ! ""
okeaniyas:okeaniyas N1 ; ! ""
pres:pres N1 ; ! ""
repressiya:repressiya N1 ;
soy:soy N1 ; ! ""
topluşu:topluşu N2 ;
territoriya:territoriya N1 ; ! ""
uluslararası:uluslarara N2 ; ! ""
yıldönümü:yıldönüm N2 ;
yustiţiya:yustiţiya N1 ; ! ""
baaşış:baaşış N1 ; ! ""
terbietmää:terbietmää N1 ; ! ""
imek:imek N1 ; ! ""
nihongo:nihongo N1 ; ! ""
iyün:iyün N5 ; ! ""
tipardan:tipardan N1 ; ! ""
karikatur:karikatur N1 ; ! ""
kolaylık:kolaylı%{k%} N1 ; ! ""
kompaniya:kompaniya N1 ; ! ""
emirlikl:emirlik N2 ; ! ""
eki:eki N2 ; ! ""
mongol:mongol N1 ; ! ""
kızkardaşı:kızkardaşı N2 ; ! ""
kommun:kommun N2 ; ! ""
kral:kral N2 ; ! ""
doklad:doklad N5 ; ! ""
yugur:yugur N1 ; ! ""
zavod:zavod N5 ; ! ""
posta:posta  N1 ; ! ""
zaametçi:zaametçi N1 ; ! ""
miting:miting N5 ; ! ""
astronom:astronom N1 ; ! ""
diploma:diploma N1 ; ! ""
poêziya:poêziya N1 ; ! ""
jurnalcı:jurnalcı N1 ; ! ""
klip:klip N5 ; ! ""
videoklip:videoklip N5 ; ! ""
videoklip:vidioklip N5 ; ! "" ! Err/Orth 
salar:salar N1 ; ! ""
sokakça:sokakça N1 ; ! ""
sahip:sahip N1 ; ! ""
başkasabası:başkasaba N2 ; ! ""
milletlik:milletli%{k%} N1 ; ! ""
stadion:stadion N1 ; ! ""
patret:patret N5 ; ! ""
haylazlık:haylazlı%{k%} N1 ; ! ""
dışişleri:dışişler%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} N3 ; ! ""
pestiţid:pestiţid N5 ; ! ""
ţentr:ţentr N5 ; ! ""
soldat:soldat N5 ; ! ""
kendilik:kendili%{k%} N1 ; ! ""
frakţiya:frakţiya N1 ; ! ""
LEXICON Adverbs
eskidän:eskidän ADV3 ; ! ""
erken:erken ADV3 ; ! ""
şindi:şindi ADV3 ; ! ""
bezbelli:bezbelli ADV3 ; ! ""
hakkında:hakkında  ADV3 ; ! "" 
artık:artıq ADV3 ; ! "anymore" ! Err/Orth
devam:devam ADV3 ; ! ""
orda:orda ADV3 ; ! ""
her:her ADV3 ;
burada:burada  ADV3 ; ! ""
büün:büün ADV4; ! ""
büün:bugün ADV4; ! "" ! Err/Orth
ozaman:ozaman ADV4 ; 
ozamannar:ozamannar ADV3 ; ! ""
ozamandan:ozamandan ADV3 ; ! ""
şindi:şindi ADV4 ; ! ""
taman:taman ADV3 ; ! "completely"
en:en ADV3 ;
enidän:enidän ADV3 ;
nicä:nicä ADV-ITG ;
nasıl:nasıl ADV-ITG ;
nasıl:nesoy ADV-ITG ;
nedän:nedän ADV-ITG ; ! ""
genä:genä ADV3 ;
hiç:hiç ADV3 ; ! "none"
sadä:sadä ADV3 ; !
sora:sora ADV4 ; ! "after, afterwards" @@@ also postp
bölä:bölä ADV4 ; !
çoktan:çoktan ADV3 ;
barabar:barabar ADV3 ; !
ilgi:ilgi ADV4 ;
burda:burda ADV3 ; ! ""
aazdan:aazdan ADV3 ;
aykıre:aykıre ADV3 ;
sık:sık ADV3 ; ! ""
yukarı:yukarı ADV3 ; ! ""
nası:nası ADV3 ; ! ""
boşuna:boşuna ADV3 ; ! ""
sevgiylän:sevgiylän ADV3 ; ! ""
gene:gene ADV3 ; ! ""
saklı:saklı ADV3 ;
ayrıca:ayrıca  ADV3 ; ! ""
kaare:kaare ADV3 ; ! ""
şüpesiz:şüpesiz ADV3 ; ! ""
bekim:bekim ADV3 ; ! ""
dayma:dayma ADV3 ; ! ""
nereyi:nereyi ADV3 ; ! ""
nezaman:nezaman ADV3 ; ! ""
herzaman:herzaman ADV3 ; ! ""
itibarıyla:itibarıyla ADV3  ; ! ""
sıravardı:sıravardı ADV3  ; ! ""
nice:nice ADV3  ; ! ""
orıy:orıy ADV3 ;
LEXICON Verbs
de:de V-TV ; 
çek:çek V-TV ;
yazı:yazı V-TV ;
as:as V-TV ;
an:an V-TV ;
koy:koy V-TV ;
düş:düş V-TV ;
başar:başar V-TV ;
bitir:bitir V-TV ; ! Der/Caus
çek:çek V-TV ;
düşün:düşün V-TV ;
kurtar:kurtar V-TV ;
bekle:beklee V-TV ;
koru:koru V-TV ;
söle:söyle V-TV ; ! Err/Orth
kayibet:kayibet V-TV ;
göster:göster V-TV ;
getir:getir V-TV ;
peydala:peydala V-TV ;
baal:baal V-TV ;
sık:sık V-TV ;  ! ""
iy:iy V-TV; ! ""
şaş:şaş V-TV ;
yolla:yolla V-TV ; ! ""
taşi:taşi V-TV ; ! ""
erleş:erleş V-TV ; ! ""
birleştir:birleştir V-TV ; ! "" ! Der/Caus
kaavileştir:kaavileştir V-TV ; ! "" ! Der/Caus
piş:piş V-TV ;
bildir:bildir V-TV ; ! "" Der/Caus
doğ:doğ V-TV ; ! ""
yık:yık V-TV ;
bra:bra V-TV ; ! ""
itir:itir V-TV ; ! ""
dene:dene V-TV ; ! ""
doorut:dooru%{T%} V-TV ; ! ""
karşılaştır:karşılaştır V-TV ; ! "" ! Der/Caus
boz:boz V-TV ; ! ""
ez:ez V-TV ; ! ""
kopar:kopar V-TV ; ! ""
sat:sa%{T%} V-TV ; ! ""
tıka:tıka V-TV ; ! ""
zenginet:zengine%{T%} V-TV ; ! ""
büüt:büü%{T%} V-TV ; ! "" ! Der/Caus
